Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-24] Motions to vacate or modify
prior orders brought or decided upon pursuant to rule 59, Hawaii family court rules.
In considering a party's motion to vacate or modify prior orders brought or
decided upon pursuant to rule 59, Hawaii family court rules, the court need not
commence a trial or hearing de novo, but rather, after such further hearing as
the court deems to be appropriate, may proceed to enter such orders as are in
the best interests of the child. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next